Colorado, session 2026A, HB1209.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-1-301, amend
(1)(a) and (1)(b); and add (1)(a.5) and (7) as follows:
29-1-301. Levies reduced - limitation - repeal.
(1) (a) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (1)(a.5) OF THIS
SECTION, all statutory tax levies for collection in 1989 and thereafter
when applied to the total valuation for assessment of the state, each of the
counties, cities, and towns not chartered as home rule except as provided
in this subsection (1), and each of the fire, sanitation, irrigation, drainage,
conservancy, and other special districts established by law shall be so
reduced as to prohibit the levying of a greater amount of revenue than
was levied in the preceding year plus five and one-half percent plus the
amount of revenue abated or refunded by the taxing entity by August 1 of
-2- HB26-1209

the current year less the amount of revenue received by the taxing entity
by August 1 of the current year as taxes paid on any taxable property that
had previously been omitted from the assessment roll of any year, except
to provide for the payment of bonds and interest thereon, for the payment
of any contractual obligation that has been approved by a majority of the
qualified electors of the taxing entity, for the payment of expenses
incurred in the reappraisal of classes or subclasses ordered by or
conducted by the state board of equalization, for the payment to the state
of excess state equalization payments to school districts which excess is
due to the undervaluation of taxable property, or for the payment of
capital expenditures as provided in subsection (1.2) of this section. For
purposes of this subsection (1), the amount of revenues received as taxes
paid on any taxable property that had been previously omitted from the
assessment roll shall not include the amount of such revenues received as
taxes paid on oil and gas leaseholds and lands that had been previously
omitted from the assessment roll due to underreporting of the selling price
or the quantity of oil or gas sold therefrom. In computing the limit, the
following shall be excluded: The increased valuation for assessment
attributable to annexation or inclusion of additional land, the
improvements thereon, and personal property connected therewith within
the taxing entity for the preceding year; the increased valuation for
assessment attributable to new construction and personal property
connected therewith, as defined by the property tax administrator in
manuals prepared pursuant to section 39-2-109 (1)(e), C.R.S., within the
taxing entity for the preceding year; the increased valuation for
assessment attributable to increased volume of production for the
preceding year by a producing mine if said mine is wholly or partially
-3- HB26-1209

within the taxing entity and if said increase in volume of production
causes an increase in the level of services provided by the taxing entity;
and the increased valuation for assessment attributable to previously
legally exempt federal property which becomes taxable if such property
causes an increase in the level of services provided by the taxing entity.
(a.5) (I) AS APPLIED TO STATUTORY TAX LEVIES FOR COLLECTION
IN PROPERTY TAX YEARS BEGINNING ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, BUT
BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2033, THE FIVE AND ONE-HALF PERCENT GROWTH
LIMIT ESTABLISHED IN SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION IS REDUCED TO
FOUR PERCENT FOR PURPOSES OF THE CALCULATION REQUIRED BY THIS
SECTION.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (1)(a.5) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2037.
(b) For property tax years beginning on or after January 1, 1991,
any taxing entity may apply to the division of local government in the
department of local affairs for authorization to exclude the following
from the computation of the limitation set forth in paragraph (a) of this
subsection (1) LIMITATIONS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (1)(a) OR (1)(a.5)
OF THIS SECTION: All or any portion of the increased valuation for
assessment attributable to new primary oil or gas production for the
preceding year from any producing oil and gas leasehold or land if such
oil and gas leasehold or land is wholly or partially within the taxing entity
and if such new primary oil or gas production has caused or will cause an
increase in the level of services provided by the taxing entity.
(7) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS PART 3 TO THE
CONTRARY, AN INCREASED LEVY ALLOWED PURSUANT TO SECTION
29-1-302 OR AN EXISTING VOTER AUTHORIZATION TO EXCEED OR WAIVE
-4- HB26-1209

THE LIMITATIONS SET FORTH IN THIS SECTION APPLIES TO THE TEMPORARY
LIMITATION SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (1)(a.5) UNLESS OTHERWISE
SPECIFIED IN THE QUESTION APPROVED BY THE VOTERS OR THE DIVISION
OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT IN THE DEPARTMENT OF LOCAL AFFAIRS.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (7) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2037.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-1-1703, amend
(1.5)(c) and (4)(b)(I) as follows:
29-1-1703. Property tax limit calculation - definitions - repeal.
(1.5) As used in subsection (1) of this section and this subsection
(1.5), unless the context otherwise requires:
(c) (I) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION
(1.5)(c)(II) OF THIS SECTION, "growth rate percentage" means five and
twenty-five hundredths percent multiplied by the number of property tax
years in the current reassessment cycle.
(II) (A) FOR PROPERTY TAX YEARS BEGINNING ON OR AFTER
JANUARY 1, 2027, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2033, "GROWTH RATE
PERCENTAGE" MEANS FOUR PERCENT MULTIPLIED BY THE NUMBER OF
PROPERTY TAX YEARS IN THE CURRENT REASSESSMENT CYCLE.
(B) THIS SUBSECTION (1.5)(c)(II) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2037.
(4) As used in subsection (3) of this section and this subsection
(4), unless the context otherwise requires:
(b) "Growth rate percentage" means the greater of:
(I) (A) FOR PROPERTY TAX YEARS OTHER THAN THOSE YEARS
BEGINNING ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2033,
six percent multiplied by the number of property tax years in the current
reassessment cycle; or
-5- HB26-1209

(B) FOR PROPERTY TAX YEARS BEGINNING ON OR AFTER JANUARY
1, 2027, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2033, FOUR PERCENT MULTIPLIED BY THE
NUMBER OF PROPERTY TAX YEARS IN THE CURRENT REASSESSMENT CYCLE;
OR
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-1-1705, add (4)
as follows:
29-1-1705. Prior obligations not impaired - voter-approval of
mill increases - disaster emergency spending - definitions - repeal.
(4) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS PART 17 TO
THE CONTRARY, AN EXISTING VOTER AUTHORIZATION TO EXCEED OR
WAIVE THE LIMITATIONS SET FORTH IN THIS PART 17 APPLIES TO THE
TEMPORARY GROWTH RATE PERCENTAGES DESCRIBED IN SECTION
29-1-1703 FOR PROPERTY TAX YEARS BEGINNING ON OR AFTER JANUARY
1, 2027, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2033, UNLESS OTHERWISE SPECIFIED IN
THE QUESTION APPROVED BY THE VOTERS.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (4) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2037.
SECTION 4. Applicability. This act applies to property tax years
commencing on or after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-6- HB26-1209